Washington statutes.
RCW 19.05.110

Administrative treasury trust account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5616.SL) ***

(1) The Washington saves administrative treasury trust account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of administrative and operating expenses of the program established under this chapter.

(3) Only the director of the administrative agency or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is exempt from appropriation and allotment provisions under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(4) The account may receive grants, gifts, or other moneys appropriated for administrative purposes from the state and the federal government.

(5) Any interest incurred by the account will be retained within the account.

[ 2024 c 327 s 11.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2024 c 327: See note following RCW 19.05.020.